Illinois, session 104th, HB4746.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Vital Records Act is amended by changing 5Section 18 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 535/18)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 73-18)7    Sec. 18. (1) Each death which occurs in this State shall be 8registered by filing a death certificate with the local 9registrar of the district in which the death occurred or the 10body was found, within 7 days after such death (within 5 days 11if the death occurs prior to January 1, 1989) and prior to 12cremation or removal of the body from the State, except when 13death is subject to investigation by the coroner or medical 14examiner. As part of the investigation, the coroner or medical 15examiner shall collect social information about the decedent 16to limit instances of misidentification, including, but not 17limited to, the decedent's manner of dress, relevant 18information about the area where the decedent was found, and 19any inconsistency in official records. If a death occurs in 20this State in a county outside the deceased's county of 21residence, the local registrar of the district in which the 22death certificate was filed shall, within 7 days of its 23filing, send a copy of the death certificate to the local   HB4746- 2 -LRB104 19431 BDA 32879 b1registrar in the district where the deceased's county of 2residence is located. 3        (a) For the purposes of this Section, if the place of 4    death is unknown, a death certificate shall be filed in 5    the registration district in which a dead body is found, 6    which shall be considered the place of death.7        (b) When a death occurs on a moving conveyance, the 8    place where the body is first removed from the conveyance 9    shall be considered the place of death and a death 10    certificate shall be filed in the registration district in 11    which such place is located.12        (c) The funeral director who first assumes custody of 13    a dead body shall be responsible for filing a completed 14    death certificate. He or she shall obtain the personal 15    data from the next of kin or the best qualified person or 16    source available; he or she shall enter on the certificate 17    the name, relationship, and address of the informant; he 18    or she shall enter the date, place, and method of final 19    disposition; he or she shall affix his or her own 20    signature and enter his or her address; and shall present 21    the certificate to the person responsible for completing 22    the medical certification of cause of death. The person 23    responsible for completing the medical certification of 24    cause of death must note the presence of 25    methicillin-resistant staphylococcus aureus, clostridium 26    difficile, or vancomycin-resistant enterococci if it is a   HB4746- 3 -LRB104 19431 BDA 32879 b1    contributing factor to or the cause of death. Additional 2    multi-drug resistant organisms (MDROs) may be added to 3    this list by the Department by rule.4    (2) The medical certification shall be completed and 5signed within 48 hours after death by the certifying health 6care professional who, within 12 months prior to the date of 7the patient's death, was treating or managing treatment of the 8patient's illness or condition which resulted in death, except 9when death is subject to the coroner's or medical examiner's 10investigation. In the absence of the certifying health care 11professional or with his or her approval, the medical 12certificate may be completed and signed by his or her 13associate physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or 14physician assistant, the chief medical officer of the 15institution in which death occurred, or the physician who 16performed an autopsy upon the decedent. 17    (3) When a death occurs without medical attendance, or 18when it is otherwise subject to the coroner's or medical 19examiner's investigation, the coroner or medical examiner 20shall be responsible for the completion of a coroner's or 21medical examiner's certificate of death and shall sign the 22medical certification within 48 hours after death, except as 23provided by regulation in special problem cases. If the 24decedent was under the age of 18 years at the time of his or 25her death, and the death was due to injuries suffered as a 26result of a motor vehicle backing over a child, or if the death   HB4746- 4 -LRB104 19431 BDA 32879 b1occurred due to the power window of a motor vehicle, the 2coroner or medical examiner must send a copy of the medical 3certification, with information documenting that the death was 4due to a vehicle backing over the child or that the death was 5caused by a power window of a vehicle, to the Department of 6Children and Family Services. The Department of Children and 7Family Services shall (i) collect this information for use by 8Child Death Review Teams and (ii) compile and maintain this 9information as part of its Annual Child Death Review Team 10Report to the General Assembly. 11    (3.5) The medical certification of cause of death shall 12expressly provide an opportunity for the person completing the 13certification to indicate that the death was caused in whole 14or in part by a dementia-related disease, Parkinson's Disease, 15or Parkinson-Dementia Complex.16    (4) When the deceased was a veteran of any war of the 17United States, the funeral director shall prepare a 18"Certificate of Burial of U. S. War Veteran", as prescribed 19and furnished by the Illinois Department of Veterans Affairs, 20and submit such certificate to the Illinois Department of 21Veterans Affairs monthly.22    (5) When a death is presumed to have occurred in this State 23but the body cannot be located, a death certificate may be 24prepared by the State Registrar upon receipt of an order of a 25court of competent jurisdiction which includes the finding of 26facts required to complete the death certificate. Such death   HB4746- 5 -LRB104 19431 BDA 32879 b1certificate shall be marked "Presumptive" and shall show on 2its face the date of the registration and shall identify the 3court and the date of the judgment.4(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-741, eff. 8-2-24; 5104-234, eff. 8-15-25.)